Florida, session 2026, SB1088.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âParagraphs (b) and (h) of subsection (13) of 21 section 744.361, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph 22 (k) is added to that subsection, to read: 23 744.361âPowers and duties of guardian.â 24 (13)âRecognizing that every individual has unique needs and 25 abilities, a guardian who is given authority over a wardâs 26 person shall, as appropriate under the circumstances: 27 (b)âAllow the ward to maintain contact with family and 28 friends. If the ward is a minor, the guardian may restrict the 29 ability of the ward to maintain any contact that the guardian 30 believes may cause harm to the ward. If the ward is an adult, 31 the guardian may not restrict the ability of the ward to 32 maintain contact with a specified person unless the guardian has 33 good cause to believe that interaction with the person poses a 34 risk of significant physical, psychological, or financial harm 35 to the ward and the restriction is: 36 1.âFor no more than 7 business days, if the person has a 37 family or preexisting social relationship with the ward; 38 2.âFor no more than 60 days, if the person does not have a 39 family or preexisting social relationship with the ward; or 40 3.âAuthorized by specific order of the court unless the 41 guardian believes that such contact may cause harm to the ward. 42 (h)âEvaluate the wardâs medical and health care options, 43 financial resources, and desires when making residential 44 decisions that are best suited for the current needs of the 45 ward. The guardian must provide the ward with notice of a change 46 in residential setting at least 14 days before the change occurs 47 if the new residential setting will be more restrictive than the 48 current residential setting. Such notice is not required if the 49 change in residential setting is authorized by the guardianship 50 plan or a court order. 51 (k)âProvide appropriate notice to any person identified in 52 an initial guardianship plan pursuant to s. 744.363(1)(h). 53 Section 2.âParagraph (h) is added to subsection (1) of 54 section 744.363, Florida Statutes, to read: 55 744.363âInitial guardianship plan.â 56 (1)âThe initial guardianship plan shall include all of the 57 following: 58 (h)âIdentification of all of the following persons: 59 1.âThe persons entitled to receive notice of the following 60 information, when such information is known or can be reasonably 61 ascertained by the guardian: 62 a.âThe incapacitated personâs death. 63 b.âThe intended disposition of the remains of the decedent. 64 c.âThe funeral arrangements for the decedent. 65 d.âThe final resting place of the decedent. 66 2.âIf the ward is incapacitated: 67 a.âThe persons entitled to notice of the incapacitated 68 personâs transfer to a medical facility. 69 b.âThe persons entitled to visit the incapacitated person. 70 However, the identification of such persons in the plan does not 71 limit the persons entitled to visit the incapacitated person. 72 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.